Maryland, session 2025, HB0218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–111.
A proceeding to hold a person in contempt of court for the person’s default in payment
of periodic child or spousal support under the terms of a court order shall be commenced
within [3] 7 years of the date each installment of support ORIGINALLY became due [and
remained unpaid].
Article – Family Law
5–525.3.
(A) ONLY IN LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES, WHERE THE ADMINISTRATION
FINDS IT APPROPRIATE, MAY ACTION BE TAKEN TO SECURE AN ASSIGNMENT TO THE
STATE OF ANY RIGHTS TO SUPPORT ON BEHALF OF A CHILD RECEIVING FOSTER
CARE MAINTENANCE PAYMENTS UNDER THIS PART III OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY TAKE ACTION, WHEN APPROPRIATE, TO
DISCONTINUE AN ASSIGNMENT OF RIGHTS TO SUPPORT AND TERMINATE EXISTING

HOUSE BILL 218 3
SUPPORT ORDERS FOR A CHILD RECEIVING FOSTER CARE MAINTENANCE
PAYMENTS.
(C) THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL ADOPT RULES AND
REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
10–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Child Support Administration of the Department
of Human Services.
(c) “Earnings” includes:
(1) any form of periodic payment to an individual, including:
(i) an annuity;
(ii) a pension;
(iii) Social Security payments;
(iv) workers’ compensation payments; and
(v) unemployment insurance benefits; [and]
(2) any commissions or fees paid in connection with the [obligor’s]
EMPLOYEE’S employment; AND
(3) ANY PAYMENT RECEIVED BY AN INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR:
(I) FROM AN EMPLOYER FOR SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE
INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR IN THE COURSE OF THE EMPLOYER’S TRADE OR
BUSINESS; AND
(II) THAT THE EMPLOYER REPORTS OR EXPECTS TO REPORT ON
IRS FORM 1099.
(d) “EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS EMPLOYED BY AN
EMPLOYER FOR A WAGE OR OTHER COMPENSATION IN THE TRADE OR BUSINESS OF
THE EMPLOYER.
(E) (1) “Employer” means any person who is paying earnings to an [obligor]
EMPLOYEE.

HOUSE BILL 218
(2) “Employer” includes:
(I) a governmental entity; AND
(II) A PERSON WHO IS PAYING EARNINGS TO AN INDEPENDENT
CONTRACTOR FOR SERVICES PROVIDED IN THE COURSE OF THE EMPLOYER’S TRADE
OR BUSINESS THAT THE EMPLOYER REPORTS OR EXPECTS TO REPORT ON IRS
FORM 1099.
(F) “INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR” MEANS A PERSON WHO:
(1) PROVIDES SERVICES TO AN EMPLOYER IN THE COURSE OF THE
EMPLOYER’S TRADE OR BUSINESS; AND
(2) RECEIVES EARNINGS FROM AN EMPLOYER THAT THE EMPLOYER
REPORTS OR EXPECTS TO REPORT ON IRS FORM 1099.
[(e)] (G) “Local support enforcement office” means 1 of the following that is
responsible for support enforcement:
(1) a county agency; or
(2) a component of the circuit court for a county.
[(f)] (H) (1) “Obligee” means any person who is entitled to receive support.
(2) “Obligee” includes a state.
[(g)] (I) “Obligor” means an individual who is required to pay support under a
court order.
[(h)] (J) “Support” includes:
(1) child support;
(2) spousal support;
(3) support of destitute adult children; and
(4) support of destitute parents.
[(i)] (K) “Support enforcement agency” means 1 of the following that receives
support payments under a court order:

HOUSE BILL 218 5
(1) the Administration; or
(2) a local support enforcement office.
10–102.
A contempt proceeding for failure to make a payment of child or spousal support
under a court order shall be [brought] COMMENCED within [3] 7 years of the date that
[the payment] EACH INSTALLMENT of support ORIGINALLY became due.
10–108.
(c) (1) In this subsection, “notice of arrearage” means a written notice provided
by the Administration:
(i) to an obligor who is in arrears in making child support payments;
and
(ii) relating to the arrearage.
(2) If the Administration sends a notice of arrearage within the first 120
days that the obligor is in arrears in making child support payments, the Administration
shall include notice that continued arrearage may result in:
(I) revocation or denial of a license under § 10–119.3 of this subtitle;
AND
(II) A LIEN BEING PLACED AGAINST A PERSONAL INJURY AWARD
UNDER § 10–119.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
10–113.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Agency” means the State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency.
(3) “FANTASY COMPETITION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–1D–01 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(4) “FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 9–1D–01 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(5) “SPORTS WAGERING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–1E–01 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 218
(6) (I) “SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 9–1E–01 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(II) “SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE” INCLUDES:
1. A MOBILE SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE, AS DEFINED
IN § 9–1E–01 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
2. AN ONLINE SPORTS WAGERING OPERATOR, AS
DEFINED IN § 9–1E–01 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; AND
3. A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE, AS
DEFINED IN § 9–1E–01 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(3)] (7) “Video lottery facility” has the meaning stated in § 9–1A–01 of
the State Government Article.
[(4)] (8) “Video lottery operation licensee” has the meaning stated in §
9–1A–01 of the State Government Article.
(b) The Administration may certify to the Agency the name of any obligor who is
in arrears in the amount of $150 or more if:
(1) the Administration has accepted an assignment of support under §
5–312(b)(2) of the Human Services Article; or
(2) the recipient of support payments has filed an application for support
enforcement services with the Administration.
(c) The certification shall contain:
(1) the full name of the obligor, and any other names known to be used by
the obligor;
(2) the Social Security number of the obligor; and
(3) the amount of the arrearage.
(d) If an obligor who has been certified as an obligor wins a lottery prize to be paid
by check directly by the Agency, the Agency shall send a notice to the obligor that:
(1) the obligor has won a prize to be paid by check directly by the [State
Lottery and Gaming Control] Agency;

HOUSE BILL 218 7
(2) the [State Lottery and Gaming Control] Agency has received
certification from the [Child Support] Administration of the obligor’s child support
arrearage in the amount specified;
(3) State law requires the [State Lottery and Gaming Control] Agency to
withhold the prize and to pay it towards the obligor’s support arrearage;
(4) the obligor has 15 days to appeal to the Administration if the obligor
disputes the existence or the amount of the arrearage; and
(5) on interception of the prize, the [State Lottery and Gaming Control]
Agency will transfer the prize or the part of the prize that equals the obligor’s child support
arrearage to the Administration.
(e) If an obligor who owes child support and has been certified as an obligor wins
a prize at a video lottery facility [requiring], FROM SPORTS WAGERING, OR IN A
FANTASY COMPETITION, AND THAT PRIZE REQUIRES the issuance of Internal Revenue
Service form W–2G or a substantially equivalent form [by a video lottery operation
licensee], the video lottery operation licensee, SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE, OR
FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR shall provide a notice to the obligor that:
(1) the obligor has won a prize to be paid by cash or check directly by the
video lottery operation licensee, SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE, OR FANTASY
COMPETITION OPERATOR;
(2) the [State Lottery and Gaming Control] Agency has received
certification from the [Child Support] Administration of the obligor’s child support
arrearage in the amount specified;
(3) State law requires the video lottery operation licensee, SPORTS
WAGERING LICENSEE, OR FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR to withhold the prize
and to pay it towards the obligor’s child support arrearage;
(4) the obligor has 15 days to appeal to the Administration if the obligor
disputes the existence or the amount of the child support arrearage; and
(5) on interception of the prize, the video lottery operation licensee,
SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE, OR FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR will transfer
the prize or the part of the prize that equals the obligor’s child support arrearage to the
Administration.
(f) (1) The Agency [or the], video lottery operation licensee, SPORTS
WAGERING LICENSEE, OR FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR shall:

HOUSE BILL 218
(i) withhold and transfer all or part of the prize up to the amount of
the arrearage to the Administration; and
(ii) pay the excess to the obligor.
(2) The Agency [and a], video lottery operation licensee, SPORTS
WAGERING LICENSEE, AND FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR shall honor
interception requests in the following order:
(i) an interception request under this section;
(ii) an interception request under § 11–618 of the Criminal
Procedure Article; and
(iii) an interception request under § 3–307 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(g) (1) On receipt of a notice from the Agency [or], video lottery operation
licensee, SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE, OR FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR, an
obligor who disputes the existence or amount of the arrearage may appeal the transfer.
(2) If no appeal is filed within 15 days, the Administration may retain the
withheld prize.
(3) If the obligor appeals the transfer, after a hearing by the
Administration, the withheld prize shall be:
(i) paid to the obligor;
(ii) retained by the Administration; or
(iii) partly paid to the obligor and partly retained by the
Administration, in the amounts specified.
(h) The Secretary of Human Services and the Director of the Agency may jointly
adopt regulations to implement this section.
(i) A video lottery operation licensee, SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE, OR
FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR may not be held liable for an act or omission taken
in good faith to comply substantially with the requirements of this section.
10–119.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 218 9
(2) “License” has the meaning stated in § 11–128 of the Transportation
Article.
(3) “Motor Vehicle Administration” means the Motor Vehicle
Administration of the Department of Transportation.
(b) (1) Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, the
Administration may notify the Motor Vehicle Administration of an obligor with a
noncommercial license who is 60 days or more out of compliance, or an obligor with a
commercial license who is 120 days or more out of compliance, with the most recent order
of the court in making child support payments if:
(i) the Administration has accepted an assignment of support under
§ 5–312(b)(2) of the Human Services Article; or
(ii) the recipient of support payments has filed an application for
support enforcement services with the Administration.
(2) Upon notification by the Administration under this subsection, the
Motor Vehicle Administration:
(i) shall suspend the obligor’s license or privilege to drive in the
State; and
(ii) may issue a work–restricted license or work–restricted privilege
to drive in the State in accordance with § 16–203 of the Transportation Article.
(c) (1) Before supplying any information to the Motor Vehicle Administration
under this section, the Administration shall:
(i) send written notice of the proposed action to the obligor,
including notice of the obligor’s right to request an investigation on any of the following
grounds:
1. the information regarding the reported arrearage is
inaccurate;
2. THE OBLIGOR’S INCOME IS NOT GREATER THAN 250%
OF THE 2024 FEDERAL POVERTY GUIDELINES FOR AN INDIVIDUAL ($37,650 PER
YEAR), UNLESS THE OBLIGOR WAS JUDICIALLY DETERMINED TO BE VOLUNTARILY
IMPOVERISHED UNDER § 12–204 OF THIS ARTICLE AT THE TIME THE MOST RECENT
CHILD SUPPORT ORDER WAS ENTERED;
3. suspension of the obligor’s license or privilege to drive
would be an impediment to the obligor’s current or potential employment; or

HOUSE BILL 218
[3.] 4. suspension of the obligor’s license or privilege to drive
would place an undue hardship on the obligor because of the obligor’s:
A. documented disability resulting in a verified inability to
work; or
B. inability to comply with the court order; and
(ii) give the obligor a reasonable opportunity to request an
investigation of the proposed action of the Administration.
(2) (i) Upon receipt of a request for investigation from the obligor, the
Administration shall conduct an investigation to determine if any of the grounds under
paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection exist.
(ii) The Administration shall:
1. send a copy of the obligor’s request for an investigation to
the obligee by first–class mail;
2. give the obligee a reasonable opportunity to respond; and
3. consider the obligee’s response.
(iii) Upon completion of the investigation, the Administration shall
notify the obligor of the results of the investigation and the obligor’s right to appeal to the
Office of Administrative Hearings.
(3) (i) An appeal under this section shall be conducted in accordance
with Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article.
(ii) An appeal shall be made in writing and shall be received by the
Office of Administrative Hearings within 20 days after the notice to the obligor of the
results of the investigation.
(4) If, after the investigation or appeal to the Office of Administrative
Hearings, the Administration finds that one of the grounds under paragraph (1)(i) of this
subsection exists, the Administration may not send any information about the obligor to
the Motor Vehicle Administration.
(5) The Administration may not send any information about an obligor to
the Motor Vehicle Administration if:
(i) the Administration reaches an agreement with the obligor
regarding a scheduled payment of the obligor’s child support arrearage or a court issues an
order for a scheduled payment of the child support arrearage; and

HOUSE BILL 218 11
(ii) the obligor is complying with the agreement or court order.
(d) (1) If, after information about an obligor is supplied to the Motor Vehicle
Administration, the obligor’s arrearage is paid in full, the obligor has demonstrated good
faith by paying the ordered amount of support for 6 consecutive months, the obligor is a
participant in full compliance in an employment program approved by the Administration,
or the Administration finds that one of the grounds under subsection (c)(1)(i) of this section
exists, the Administration shall notify the Motor Vehicle Administration to reinstate the
obligor’s license or privilege to drive.
(2) The Administration may request that the Motor Vehicle
Administration expunge a record of a suspension of a license or privilege to drive for failure
to pay child support:
(i) for an obligor who is enrolled in and compliant with an
employment program approved by the Administration; or
(ii) if the information reported by the Administration that led to the
suspension was inaccurate.
(e) The Secretary of Human Services, in cooperation with the Secretary of
Transportation and the Office of Administrative Hearings, shall adopt regulations to
implement this section.
10–119.3.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a
licensing authority shall:
(i) require each applicant for a license to disclose the Social Security
number of the applicant; and
(ii) record the applicant’s Social Security number on the application.
(2) The Department of Natural Resources shall:
(i) require an applicant for a recreational hunting or fishing license
to disclose only the last four digits of the Social Security number of the applicant instead of
the full Social Security number; and
(ii) record the applicant’s partial Social Security number on the
application.
(3) Each health occupations board and the State Emergency Services
Board shall:
(i) require each applicant for a license to:

HOUSE BILL 218
1. disclose the APPLICANT’S Social Security number [or], IF
THE APPLICANT HAS ONE;
2. IF THE APPLICANT DOES NOT HAVE A SOCIAL
SECURITY NUMBER, DISCLOSE THE Individual Taxpayer Identification Number of the
applicant; or
[2.] 3. [provide alternative documentation as permitted by the
Department of Health and Human Services under Section 466(a)(13) of the Social Security
Act] IF THE APPLICANT DOES NOT HAVE A SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER OR AN
INDIVIDUAL TAXPAYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER, PROVIDE A SWORN STATEMENT,
SIGNED UNDER THE PENALTY OF PERJURY, THAT THE APPLICANT DOES NOT HAVE
A SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER OR INDIVIDUAL TAXPAYER IDENTIFICATION
NUMBER, ALONG WITH THE LICENSE APPLICATION; and
(ii) [record] MAINTAIN the applicant’s Social Security number,
Individual Taxpayer Identification Number, or [alternative documentation] AFFIDAVIT
provided under item (i) of this paragraph in the application file.
10–119.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AWARD RECIPIENT” MEANS A PERSON WHO RECEIVES OR IS TO
RECEIVE A PERSONAL INJURY AWARD.
(3) “INTERCEPT DATE” MEANS THE DATE THAT THE AWARD
RECIPIENT IS NOTIFIED THAT MONEY IS BEING WITHHELD FOR SUPPORT ARREARS
FROM A PERSONAL INJURY AWARD.
(4) “MAXIMUM LIEN AMOUNT” REFERS TO THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT OF
A NET RECOVERY WHICH IS SUBJECT TO EXECUTION FOR SUPPORT ARREARS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–504(I)(2) OF THE COURTS ARTICLE.
(5) “NET RECOVERY” MEANS THE SUM OF MONEY TO BE DISTRIBUTED
TO AN AWARD RECIPIENT AFTER DEDUCTION OF ATTORNEY’S FEES AND EXPENSES,
MEDICAL BILLS, AND THE SATISFACTION OF ANY LIENS OR SUBROGATION CLAIMS
ARISING OUT OF THE SICKNESS, ACCIDENT, INJURY, OR DEATH THAT RESULTED IN
THE PERSONAL INJURY AWARD, INCLUDING THOSE ARISING UNDER:
(I) THE MEDICARE SECONDARY PAYER ACT, 42 U.S.C. §
1395Y;

HOUSE BILL 218 13
(II) A PROGRAM OF THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
FOR WHICH A RIGHT OF SUBROGATION EXISTS UNDER §§ 15–120 AND 15–121.1 OF
THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(III) AN EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLAN SUBJECT TO THE FEDERAL
EMPLOYEE RETIREMENT INCOME SECURITY ACT OF 1974; OR
(IV) A HEALTH INSURANCE CONTRACT.
(6) “PAYING AGENT” MEANS THE PERSON OR ENTITY RESPONSIBLE
FOR DISTRIBUTION OF THE PERSONAL INJURY AWARD AND INCLUDES:
(I) THE AWARD RECIPIENT’S ATTORNEY, IF AN ATTORNEY
REPRESENTED THE AWARD RECIPIENT FOR THE SICKNESS, ACCIDENT, INJURY, OR
DEATH THAT RESULTED IN THE PERSONAL INJURY AWARD; OR
(II) IF THE AWARD RECIPIENT WAS NOT REPRESENTED BY AN
ATTORNEY, THE EMPLOYER, PROPERTY AND CASUALTY INSURER, OR
SELF–INSURER WHO IS TO PAY THE PERSONAL INJURY AWARD TO THE AWARD
RECIPIENT.
(7) “PERSONAL INJURY AWARD” MEANS A LUMP SUM PAYABLE TO AN
AWARD RECIPIENT FOR SICKNESS, ACCIDENT, INJURY, OR DEATH OF ANY PERSON,
INCLUDING COMPENSATION FOR LOSS OF FUTURE EARNINGS, AND INCLUDES
MONEY PAID ON ACCOUNT OF ANY CLAIM, SUIT, JUDGMENT, ARBITRATION,
SETTLEMENT, COMPROMISE, INSURANCE, ANNUITY, BENEFIT, COMPENSATION, OR
RELIEF.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSONAL INJURY AWARD DUE TO
AN AWARD RECIPIENT WHO IS UNDER THE AGE OF 12 YEARS.
(C) (1) CHILD SUPPORT ARREARS SHALL BE A LIEN BY OPERATION OF
LAW AGAINST THE NET RECOVERY OF A PERSONAL INJURY AWARD UP TO THE
MAXIMUM LIEN AMOUNT.
(2) THE LIEN IS PERFECTED ON:
(I) THE ADMINISTRATION’S ENTRY OF THE LIEN INFORMATION
INTO AN AUTOMATED NETWORK OR DATA MATCH PROCESS COMMONLY USED IN THE
INSURANCE INDUSTRY; OR
(II) WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE PAYING AGENT.

HOUSE BILL 218
(D) (1) IF THE AWARD RECIPIENT OWES CHILD SUPPORT ARREARS, ON
NOTICE BY THE ADMINISTRATION, THE PAYING AGENT SHALL:
(I) WITHHOLD THE LESSER OF THE AMOUNT OF THE ARREARS
OR THE MAXIMUM LIEN AMOUNT AND PROMPTLY FORWARD THE WITHHELD AMOUNT
TO THE ADMINISTRATION TO BE APPLIED TO THE AWARD RECIPIENT’S SUPPORT
ARREARAGE;
(II) PROMPTLY PAY ANY REMAINING PORTION OF THE NET
RECOVERY NOT SUBJECT TO OTHER LIENS TO THE AWARD RECIPIENT; AND
(III) SEND A NOTICE TO THE ADMINISTRATION AND THE AWARD
RECIPIENT OF:
1. THE AMOUNT PAID TO THE ADMINISTRATION; AND
2. THE AWARD RECIPIENT’S RIGHT TO CHALLENGE THE
WITHHOLDING UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE AWARD RECIPIENT’S EXERCISE OF THE RIGHT TO
CHALLENGE THE WITHHOLDING DOES NOT RELIEVE THE PAYING AGENT OF THE
DUTY TO FORWARD PAYMENT TO THE ADMINISTRATION.
(3) THE PAYING AGENT MAY NOT CHARGE THE ADMINISTRATION A
FEE FOR ITS ACTIONS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(4) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE A BASIS FOR A PAYING
AGENT TO DELAY THE PAYMENT OF THE REMAINING PORTION OF THE NET
RECOVERY TO THE AWARD RECIPIENT.
(E) (1) (I) UPON RECEIPT OF THE FUNDS FROM THE PAYING AGENT,
THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL APPLY THE FUNDS TO THE OBLIGOR’S ARREARS.
(II) IF THE OBLIGOR HAS MORE THAN ONE CHILD SUPPORT
CASE WITH ARREARS, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ALLOCATE THE AMOUNT
RECEIVED AMONG ONE OR MORE OF THE OBLIGOR’S CASES AS DETERMINED
APPROPRIATE BY THE ADMINISTRATION.
(2) IF THE ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES THAT THE AMOUNT IT
RECEIVED EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT OF THE AWARD RECIPIENT’S ARREARS, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL PAY THE EXCESS AMOUNT TO THE OBLIGOR.

HOUSE BILL 218 15
(F) (1) AN AWARD RECIPIENT MAY ASK THE ADMINISTRATION TO
INVESTIGATE THE WITHHOLDING BY FILING A WRITTEN REQUEST FOR
INVESTIGATION WITH THE ADMINISTRATION SETTING FORTH THE REASONS FOR
THE CHALLENGE.
(2) THE REQUEST MAY BE BASED SOLELY ON THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THERE IS NO ARREARAGE;
(II) THE AMOUNT OF THE ARREARAGE IS INCORRECT; OR
(III) THE AWARD RECIPIENT IS NOT THE INDIVIDUAL WHO OWES
THE ARREARS.
(3) (I) THE REQUEST FOR INVESTIGATION MUST BE RECEIVED BY
THE ADMINISTRATION WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE INTERCEPT DATE.
(II) IF A TIMELY REQUEST FOR INVESTIGATION IS NOT
RECEIVED BY THE ADMINISTRATION, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY RETAIN THE
INTERCEPTED FUNDS FOR APPLICATION TO THE AWARD RECIPIENT’S ARREARS.
(4) AN AWARD RECIPIENT MAY WITHDRAW A REQUEST FOR
INVESTIGATION BY SUBMITTING A NOTICE OF THE WITHDRAWAL TO THE
ADMINISTRATION.
(G) (1) ON RECEIPT OF A REQUEST FOR INVESTIGATION FROM THE
AWARD RECIPIENT, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL CONDUCT AN INVESTIGATION.
(2) (I) IF, AFTER THE INVESTIGATION, THE ADMINISTRATION
FINDS THAT THERE IS NO ARREARAGE, OR THAT THE AWARD RECIPIENT IS NOT THE
INDIVIDUAL WHO OWES THE ARREARS, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL REFUND THE
FULL AMOUNT OF THE FUNDS RECEIVED FROM THE PAYING AGENT TO THE AWARD
RECIPIENT.
(II) IF, AFTER THE INVESTIGATION, THE ADMINISTRATION
FINDS THAT THERE IS AN ARREARAGE, BUT IT IS LESS THAN THE AMOUNT RECEIVED
FROM THE PAYING AGENT, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL CORRECT ITS RECORDS
AND RELEASE THE EXCESS AMOUNT TO THE AWARD RECIPIENT.
(III) IF, AFTER THE INVESTIGATION, THE ADMINISTRATION
FINDS THAT THE AWARD RECIPIENT OWES ARREARS IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO OR
GREATER THAN THE AMOUNT RECEIVED FROM THE PAYING AGENT, THE

HOUSE BILL 218
ADMINISTRATION SHALL RETAIN THE INTERCEPTED FUNDS FOR APPLICATION TO
THE AWARD RECIPIENT’S ARREARS.
(3) (I) ON COMPLETION OF THE INVESTIGATION, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL SEND THE AWARD RECIPIENT A NOTICE BY FIRST–CLASS
MAIL OF THE OUTCOME OF THE INVESTIGATION.
(II) THE NOTICE SHALL INFORM THE AWARD RECIPIENT OF THE
RIGHT TO APPEAL THE ADMINISTRATION’S DECISION TO THE OFFICE OF
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF THE NOTICE.
(H) (1) IF AN AWARD RECIPIENT WHO TIMELY REQUESTED AN
INVESTIGATION DISAGREES WITH THE RESULTS OF THE INVESTIGATION, THE
AWARD RECIPIENT MAY APPEAL TO THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.
(2) AN APPEAL TO THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS MAY
BE BASED SOLELY ON THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THERE IS NO ARREARAGE;
(II) THE AMOUNT OF THE ARREARAGE IS INCORRECT; OR
(III) THE AWARD RECIPIENT IS NOT THE INDIVIDUAL WHO OWES
THE ARREARS.
(3) AN APPEAL TO THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(4) AN AWARD RECIPIENT MAY WITHDRAW AN APPEAL REQUEST BY
SUBMITTING A NOTICE OF THE WITHDRAWAL TO THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARINGS BEFORE THE HEARING DATE.
(5) (I) AFTER THE COMPLETION OF AN APPEAL, IF THE OFFICE OF
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FINDS THAT THERE IS NO ARREARAGE, OR THAT THE
AWARD RECIPIENT IS NOT THE INDIVIDUAL WHO OWES THE ARREARS, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL REFUND THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE FUNDS RECEIVED
FROM THE PAYING AGENT TO THE AWARD RECIPIENT.
(II) AFTER THE COMPLETION OF AN APPEAL, IF THE OFFICE OF
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FINDS THAT THERE IS AN ARREARAGE BUT IT IS LESS
THAN THE AMOUNT RECEIVED FROM THE PAYING AGENT, THE ADMINISTRATION

HOUSE BILL 218 17
SHALL CORRECT ITS RECORDS AND RELEASE THE EXCESS AMOUNT TO THE AWARD
RECIPIENT.
(III) AFTER THE COMPLETION OF AN APPEAL, IF THE OFFICE OF
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FINDS THAT THE AWARD RECIPIENT OWES ARREARS IN
AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO OR GREATER THAN THE AMOUNT RECEIVED FROM THE
PAYING AGENT, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL RETAIN THE INTERCEPTED FUNDS
FOR APPLICATION TO THE AWARD RECIPIENT’S ARREARS.
(6) IF THE AWARD RECIPIENT DOES NOT FILE A TIMELY APPEAL TO
THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY RETAIN
THE FULL PAYMENT FROM THE PAYING AGENT FOR APPLICATION TO THE AWARD
RECIPIENT’S ARREARS.
(I) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY UTILIZE THE PROCEDURES
ESTABLISHED IN THIS SECTION EXCLUSIVELY TO COLLECT DELINQUENT CHILD
SUPPORT.
(2) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT OR PROHIBIT
THE ADMINISTRATION FROM COLLECTING DELINQUENT CHILD SUPPORT IN ANY
OTHER MANNER AUTHORIZED BY LAW.
(J) (1) A PAYING AGENT WHO, IN GOOD FAITH, MAKES A DISTRIBUTION
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION SHALL BE IMMUNE FROM ANY CIVIL,
CRIMINAL, OR ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTIES FOR MAKING AN ERRONEOUS
DISTRIBUTION TO THE ADMINISTRATION.
(2) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL GIVE RISE TO A CLAIM OR
CAUSE OF ACTION AGAINST A PAYING AGENT BY ANY PERSON WHO CLAIMS TO BE
THE INTENDED OBLIGEE OF THE OUTSTANDING LIEN FOR SUPPORT.
(K) THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO
CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
10–122.
(a) The amount of the earnings withholding shall:
(1) be enough to pay the CURRENT AND ONGOING support and any
arrearage included in the payments required by the support order; and
(2) include any arrearage accrued since the support order.

HOUSE BILL 218
(b) (1) (i) When arrearages under subsection (a)(2) of this section are part
of an earnings withholding order or earnings withholding notice, the total arrearage
withheld shall be in one lump–sum payment or apportioned over a period of time.
(ii) The amount of the arrearage withheld under subparagraph (i) of
this paragraph shall be determined by the tribunal or, in a case in which the
Administration is providing support services, by the Administration.
(2) The amount of arrears under subsection (a)(2) of this section
apportioned to each payment shall be at least $1 but not more than 25% of the current
support payment.
(3) IF ARREARS REMAIN DUE AND OWING AFTER ALL CHILDREN WHO
ARE THE SUBJECT OF A SUPPORT ORDER HAVE BECOME EMANCIPATED, EARNINGS
WITHHOLDING SHALL CONTINUE AT THE RATE ESTABLISHED BEFORE THE
EMANCIPATION, WITH THE FULL AMOUNT WITHHELD TO BE APPLIED TO THE
EXISTING ARREARAGE UNTIL THE ARREARS ARE PAID IN FULL OR UNTIL A COURT
MODIFIES THE REPAYMENT AMOUNT.
(c) If there is more than one earnings withholding order or earnings withholding
notice against a single obligor, the Administration shall allocate amounts available for
withholding, giving priority to current support, up to the limits imposed by the federal
Consumer Credit Protection Act.
10–139.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DATE OF EMPLOYMENT” MEANS THE DATE ON WHICH
AN INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR COMMENCES PROVIDING SERVICES FOR AN
EMPLOYER.
(B) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
WITHIN 20 DAYS AFTER AN INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR BEGINS EMPLOYMENT, THE
INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR’S EMPLOYER SHALL SUBMIT TO THE
ADMINISTRATION:
(1) THE SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER OF THE INDEPENDENT
CONTRACTOR, OR IF THE INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR DOES NOT HAVE A SOCIAL
SECURITY NUMBER, THE INDIVIDUAL TAX IDENTIFICATION NUMBER OF THE
INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR;
(2) THE NAME OF THE INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR;
(3) THE ADDRESS OF THE INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR;
(4) THE DATE OF EMPLOYMENT;

HOUSE BILL 218 19
(5) THE EMPLOYER’S NAME AND ADDRESS;
(6) THE INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR’S RATE OF COMPENSATION OR
EARNINGS;
(7) A STATEMENT INDICATING WHETHER THE INDEPENDENT
CONTRACTOR HAS HEALTH INSURANCE PROVIDED BY THE EMPLOYER; AND
(8) THE FEDERAL EMPLOYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER OF THE
EMPLOYER.
(C) (1) THE EMPLOYER SHALL REPORT INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION:
(I) BY MAIL;
(II) MAGNETICALLY OR ELECTRONICALLY; OR
(III) BY OTHER MEANS AS DETERMINED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION.
(2) IF AN EMPLOYER CHOOSES TO TRANSMIT DATA MAGNETICALLY
OR ELECTRONICALLY AT A RATE OF TWICE PER MONTH, THE REPORTS SHALL BE
SUBMITTED NOT LESS THAN 12 DAYS OR MORE THAN 16 DAYS APART.
(D) (1) AN EMPLOYER THAT FAILS TO REPORT AS REQUIRED SHALL BE:
(I) GIVEN A WRITTEN WARNING FOR THE FIRST VIOLATION;
AND
(II) SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY OF $20 FOR EACH MONTH IN
WHICH A SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION OCCURS, OR $500 IF THE FAILURE IS THE RESULT
OF A CONSPIRACY BETWEEN THE EMPLOYER AND THE INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR
TO NOT SUPPLY THE REQUIRED REPORT OR TO SUPPLY A FALSE OR INCOMPLETE
REPORT, UNLESS THE ADMINISTRATION WAIVES THE PENALTY FOR CAUSE.
(2) ALL VIOLATIONS BY THE SAME EMPLOYING UNIT OCCURRING IN A
SINGLE MONTH SHALL BE CONSIDERED A SINGLE VIOLATION.
(E) (1) AN ASSESSMENT UNDER THIS SECTION IS FINAL UNLESS, WITHIN
15 DAYS AFTER THE MAILING OF THE ASSESSMENT, THE EMPLOYER APPLIES TO THE
ADMINISTRATION FOR A HEARING.

HOUSE BILL 218
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY FORWARD THE APPLICATION TO THE
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FOR ADJUDICATION.
(F) AN EMPLOYER THAT IN GOOD FAITH REPORTS INFORMATION TO THE
ADMINISTRATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION IS NOT LIABLE FOR THE
DISCLOSURE UNDER STATE LAW.
(G) THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES MAY ADOPT RULES AND
REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
12–104.
(a) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE
court may modify a child support award subsequent to the filing of a [motion] PETITION
for modification and upon a showing of a material change of circumstance.
(b) The court may not retroactively modify a child support award prior to the date
of the filing of the [motion] PETITION for modification.
(c) If a party becomes incarcerated, the court may determine that a material
change of circumstance warranting a modification of child support has occurred, provided
that the party’s ability to pay child support is sufficiently reduced due to incarceration.
(D) THE COURT MAY MODIFY THE AMOUNT TO BE PAID TOWARD AN
ARREARAGE AT ANY TIME WITHOUT A SHOWING OF A MATERIAL CHANGE OF
CIRCUMSTANCE.
12–104.2.
THE COURT SHALL TERMINATE A CHILD SUPPORT ORDER THAT WAS
PREVIOUSLY ESTABLISHED OR ASSIGNED FOR A CHILD RECEIVING A FOSTER CARE
MAINTENANCE PAYMENT, WITHOUT A SHOWING OF A MATERIAL CHANGE OF
CIRCUMSTANCE, ON THE FILING FOR A TERMINATION BY THE CHILD SUPPORT
ADMINISTRATION, LOCAL OFFICE OF CHILD SUPPORT, OR LOCAL DEPARTMENT,
AFTER THE SOCIAL SERVICES ADMINISTRATION, OR ITS DESIGNEE, DETERMINES
THAT THE ORDER IS NO LONGER APPROPRIATE.
12–201.
(c) (1) “Adjusted actual income” means actual income minus:
[(1)] (I) preexisting reasonable child support obligations actually paid;
[and

HOUSE BILL 218 21
(2)] (II) except as provided in § 12–204(a)(2) of this subtitle, alimony or
maintenance obligations actually paid; AND
(III) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A DEDUCTION FOR SUPPORT FOR EACH CHILD LIVING IN THE
PARENT’S HOME, TO WHOM THE PARENT OWES A LEGAL DUTY OF SUPPORT,
PROVIDED:
1. THE CHILD SPENDS AT LEAST 92 OVERNIGHTS PER
YEAR IN THE PARENT’S HOME; AND
2. THE PARENT IS NOT OTHERWISE OBLIGATED TO PAY
CHILD SUPPORT FOR THE CHILD IN ACCORDANCE WITH A COURT ORDER.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF THE
DEDUCTION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) THE BASIC CHILD SUPPORT OBLIGATION FOR EACH
ADDITIONAL ELIGIBLE CHILD IN THE PARENT’S HOME SHALL BE DETERMINED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–204 OF THIS SUBTITLE, USING ONLY THE ACTUAL INCOME
OF THE PARENT ENTITLED TO THE DEDUCTION; AND
(II) THE AMOUNT DETERMINED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE MULTIPLIED BY 0.75.
(3) THE COURT SHALL DECLINE TO AWARD A DEDUCTION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE COURT FINDS, AFTER
CONSIDERING THE EVIDENCE AND THE BEST INTEREST OF THE CHILD FOR WHOM
SUPPORT IS BEING DETERMINED, THAT THE APPLICATION OF THE DEDUCTION
WOULD BE UNJUST OR INAPPROPRIATE.
(n) “Self–support reserve” means the adjustment to a basic child support
obligation ensuring that a child support obligor maintains a minimum amount of monthly
income, after payment of child support, federal and state income taxes, and Federal
Insurance Contribution Act taxes, of at least 110% of the 2019 federal poverty [level]
GUIDELINES for an individual ($1,145).
12–202.
(a) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection and
subsection (b) of this section, in any proceeding to establish or modify child support,
whether pendente lite or permanent, the court shall use the child support guidelines set
forth in this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 218
(2) (i) There is a rebuttable presumption that the amount of child
support which would result from the application of the child support guidelines set forth in
this subtitle is the correct amount of child support to be awarded.
(ii) The presumption may be rebutted by evidence that the
application of the guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case.
(iii) In determining whether the application of the guidelines would
be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case, the court may consider:
1. the terms of any existing separation or property
settlement agreement or court order, including:
A. any provisions for payment of mortgages [or], marital
debts, [payment of] OR college education expenses[,];
B. the terms of any use and possession order or right to
occupy the family home under an agreement[,];
C. any direct payments made for the benefit of the children
required by THE agreement or order[,]; or
D. any other financial considerations set out in an existing
separation or property settlement agreement or court order; AND
2. [the presence in the household of either parent of other
children to whom that parent owes a duty of support and the expenses for whom that parent
is directly contributing; and
3.] whether an obligor’s monthly child support obligation
would leave the obligor with a monthly actual income below 110% of the 2019 federal
poverty [level] GUIDELINES for an individual (LESS THAN $1,145).
(iv) [The presumption may not be rebutted solely on the basis of
evidence of the presence in the household of either parent of other children to whom that
parent owes a duty of support and the expenses for whom that parent is directly
contributing.
(v)] 1. If the court determines that the application of the
guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case, the court shall make a
written finding or specific finding on the record stating the reasons for departing from the
guidelines.
2. The court’s finding shall state:

HOUSE BILL 218 23
A. the amount of child support that would have been required
under the guidelines;
B. how the order varies from the guidelines;
C. how the finding serves the best interests of the child WHO
IS THE SUBJECT OF THE ORDER; and
D. in cases in which items of value are conveyed instead of a
portion of the support presumed under the guidelines, the estimated value of the items
conveyed.
12–204.
(a) (1) The basic child support obligation shall be determined in accordance
with the schedule of basic child support obligations in subsection (e) of this section. The
basic child support obligation shall be divided between the parents in proportion to their
adjusted actual incomes.
(2) (i) If one or both parents have made a request for alimony or
maintenance in the proceeding in which a child support award is sought, the court shall
decide the issue and amount of alimony or maintenance before determining the child
support obligation under these guidelines.
(ii) If the court awards alimony or maintenance, the amount of
alimony or maintenance awarded shall be considered actual income for the recipient of the
alimony or maintenance and shall be subtracted from the income of the payor of the alimony
or maintenance under [§ 12–201(c)(2)] § 12–201(C)(1)(II) of this subtitle before the court
determines the amount of a child support award.
(3) THE AMOUNT OF THE DEDUCTION FOR THE SUPPORT OF
ADDITIONAL CHILDREN LIVING IN A PARENT’S HOME UNDER §
12–201(C)(1)(III) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE SUBTRACTED FROM THE PARENT’S
ACTUAL INCOME BEFORE THE COURT DETERMINES THE AMOUNT OF A CHILD
SUPPORT AWARD.
Article – Transportation
16–203.
(a) In this section, “Child Support Administration” means the Child Support
Administration of the Department of Human Services.
(b) On notification by the Child Support Administration in accordance with §
10–119 of the Family Law Article that an obligor WITH A NONCOMMERCIAL DRIVER’S
LICENSE is 60 days or more out of compliance with the most recent CHILD SUPPORT order

HOUSE BILL 218
[of the court in making child support payments], OR AN OBLIGOR WITH A COMMERCIAL
DRIVER’S LICENSE IS 120 DAYS OR MORE OUT OF COMPLIANCE WITH THE MOST
RECENT CHILD SUPPORT ORDER, the Administration:
(1) Shall suspend an obligor’s license or privilege to drive in the State; and
(2) May issue a work–restricted license or work–restricted privilege to
drive.
(c) (1) Prior to the suspension of a license or the privilege to drive in the State
and the issuance of a work–restricted license or work–restricted privilege to drive under
subsection (b) of this section, the Administration shall send written notice of the proposed
action to the obligor, including notice of the obligor’s right to contest the accuracy of the
information.
(2) Any contest under this subsection shall be limited to whether the
Administration has mistaken the identity of the obligor or the individual whose license or
privilege to drive has been suspended.
(d) (1) An obligor may appeal a decision of the Administration to suspend the
obligor’s license or privilege to drive.
(2) At a hearing under this subsection, the issue shall be limited to whether
the Administration has mistaken the identity of the obligor or the individual whose license
or privilege to drive has been suspended.
(e) The Administration shall reinstate an obligor’s license or privilege to drive in
the State if:
(1) The Administration receives a court order to reinstate the license or
privilege to drive; or
(2) The Child Support Administration notifies the Administration that:
(i) The individual whose license or privilege to drive was suspended
is not [in arrears in making child support payments] 60 DAYS OUT OF COMPLIANCE WITH
THE MOST RECENT CHILD SUPPORT ORDER IF THE INDIVIDUAL HAS A
NONCOMMERCIAL DRIVER’S LICENSE, OR 120 DAYS OUT OF COMPLIANCE WITH THE
MOST RECENT CHILD SUPPORT ORDER IF THE INDIVIDUAL HAS A COMMERCIAL
DRIVER’S LICENSE;
(ii) The obligor has paid the support arrearage in full;
(iii) The obligor has demonstrated good faith by paying the ordered
amount of support for 6 consecutive months;

HOUSE BILL 218 25
(iv) The obligor is a participant in full compliance in an employment
program approved by the Child Support Administration; or
(v) One of the grounds under § 10–119(c)(1)(i) of the Family Law
Article exists.
(f) The Secretary of Transportation, in cooperation with the Secretary of Human
Services and the Office of Administrative Hearings, shall adopt regulations to implement
this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.